Washington statutes.
RCW 7.110.040

Plaintiff may use pseudonym.

In an action under this chapter a plaintiff may proceed using a pseudonym in place of the true name of the plaintiff under applicable state law or procedural rule.

[ 2023 c 65 s 5.]